Hawaii statutes.
[§353-13.1] Nonemergency medical, dental,
mental health services or treatment; intentional injury; payment by inmates.
(a) The department of public safety may develop policies and procedures
governing the assessment of fees upon detainees and committed persons who
receive certain medical, dental, or mental health services or treatment. In
adopting these policies and procedures, the department shall safeguard the
health and welfare of detainees and committed persons.

(b) The policies and procedures shall enable
the department to assess fees upon detainees and committed persons who:

(1) Request certain nonemergency medical, dental, or
mental health services or treatment; or

(2) Intentionally inflict injury to themselves.

(c) The policies and procedures shall include
an appeals process to allow a detainee or committed person to appeal the
assessment.

(d) The department of public safety may adopt
policies and procedures to establish a fee schedule for medical, dental, and
mental health services or treatment under the following conditions:

(1) Fees shall be assessed from the detained or
committed person's individual trust account pursuant to section 353-20; and

(2) Fees shall not be assessed if the individual
trust account balance is less than $10; provided that the department may
implement a procedure to recover fees in the future. [L 1998, c 250, §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next